Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.240

Compensation boards—Duties as to compensation applications.

The compensation board shall hear and decide all applications for compensation under this chapter. The board shall submit its recommendations to the director on such forms as he or she may prescribe. In case the decision of the director is different from the recommendation of the compensation board, the matter shall be submitted to the state emergency management council for action.

[ 1986 c 266 s 33; 1984 c 38 s 25; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 27; 1953 c 223 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.